District of Columbia statutes.
47-831

Omitted properties; void assessments; notice and appeal.

(a)

If the Department of Finance and Revenue shall learn that any property liable to taxation has been omitted from the assessment for any previous year or years, or has been so assessed that the assessment made was void, it shall be a duty at once to reassess this property for each and every year for which it has escaped assessment and taxation, and report the same, through the Assessor, to the Collector of Taxes who shall at once proceed to collect the taxes so in arrears as other taxes are collected; provided, that no property which has escaped assessment and taxation shall be liable under this section for a period of more than 3 years prior to such assessment, except in the case of property involved in litigation. In addition to the duties of the Assessor hereinbefore provided, it shall be the duty of the Assessor upon reassessment as herein provided to notify the owner by writing of the fact of such reassessment. An owner aggrieved by a reassessment made under this section may petition for administrative review, and appeal from a final determination thereof, in the same manner and to the same extent as a new owner under §  47-825.01(f-1).

(b)

This section shall not apply when the owner has a duty to notify the Collector of Taxes of the cessation of eligibility for a deduction, classification, exemption, or deferral.

History

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 693, ch. 690, title IX, § 5(d)
May 16, 1938, 52 Stat. 372, ch. 223, § 8
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 580, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 161(a)(5)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 502(u), 48 DCR 334
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(j), 50 DCR 896
Oct, 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1143(b), 52 DCR 7503
July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-155, § 2(b), 59 DCR 5590

Cross References

Superior Court Tax Division, appeals of real estate assessments, see § 47-3305.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-811.02, § 47-1005.01, § 47-3305, § 47-4610, and § 47-4628.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-831.
1973 Ed., § 47-712.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-305 substituted “owner” for “real property owner” and “any real property owner” wherever they appear; and rewrote the last sentence which had read: “Any person aggrieved by any reassessment made in pursuance of this section may, within 6 months after notice of said reassessment, appeal from said reassessment in the same manner and to the same extent as provided in 47- 3303 and 47-3304.”
D.C. Law 14-282 designated the existing text as subsection (a); and added subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 16-33, in subsec. (b), substituted “exemption, or deferral” for “or exemption”.
D.C. Law 19-155, in subsec. (a), substituted “, within 45 days from the date of the notice, petition for an administrative review of the reassessment and appeal from a final determination thereof, to the same extent as if the appeal were filed under 47-825.01a(d)(2)” for “petition for administrative review, and appeal from a final determination thereof, in the same manner and to the same extent as a new owner under § 47-825.01(f-1)”.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(r) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(k) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(k) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(t) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(k) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(k) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(k) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 1143(b), 1144 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

References in Text

Pursuant to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s “Notice of Public Interest” published in the April 18, 1997, issue of the District of Columbia Register ( 44 DCR 2345) the Office of Tax and Revenue assumed all of the duties and functions previously performed by the Department of Finance and Revenue, as set forth in Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. This action was made effective January 22, 1997, nunc pro tunc.

Editor's Notes

Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.

Section 1144 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that §§ 1142 and 1143 shall apply to tax periods beginning after September 30, 2005.